Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 20 Processing, Grading, Labeling, and Marketing of Products
2-20-403. Penalties.

Any first purchaser or other person required to pay an assessment under this subchapter who fails to pay any assessment when due shall forfeit a penalty of two percent (2%) of the assessment each month beginning the day following the date the assessment was due.

The penalty shall be paid to the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board or to its designee, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, and shall be disposed of in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of an assessment as provided in this subchapter.

The board or its designee shall collect the penalty levied in this section, together with the delinquent assessment, by any and all of the following methods:

Voluntary payment by the person liable;

Legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Injunctive relief to enjoin any person owing the assessment or penalty from operating his or her business or engaging in business as a buyer or seller of soybeans until the delinquent assessment or penalty is paid.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this subchapter who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises or any book, record, or other document relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent the inspection shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(2).

The Governor shall appoint three (3) members from the list submitted by the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, and two (2) members from the list submitted by each of the other organizations named above to serve on the board.

All of the nine (9) producer members of the board shall be practical producers of soybeans in the State of Arkansas and shall be nominated by their respective organizations;

Each year, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of the current board members whose terms expire, the organizations named in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall submit to the Governor names of two (2) nominees for each position to be filled on the board from the respective organizations, and the Governor shall appoint the new members from each list of nominees; and

Each member selected shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until his or her successor is duly selected as provided in this section.

The board is designated as the qualified state soybean board to represent the State of Arkansas under the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1971, No. 259, § 2 provided in part, that the initial members selected from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation would draw lots to determine their terms so that two of the members would serve for two-year terms and one would serve for a one-year term while the members from each of the other organizations would draw lots for terms so that one would serve for a one-year term and one would serve for a two-year term.

U.S. Code. The Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act, referred to in (d), is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

Cross References. Division of Agriculture — Service on boards or commissions, §6-64-106.

To conduct plans, projects, or activities that are intended to strengthen the soybean industry's position in the marketplace;

To report to the United Soybean Board the manner in which assessments are collected and the procedure utilized to ensure that assessments due are paid;

To collect assessments paid on soybeans marketed within the state and to establish procedures for ensuring compliance with regard to the payment of such assessments; provided, that the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board may designate the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration to collect assessments and ensure compliance with regard to the payment of such assessments, subject to such rules as may be promulgated by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board and as may be reasonably necessary to comply with the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990;

To remit to the United Soybean Board any assessments paid under this subchapter and the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990, minus authorized credits and other required deductions, by the last day of the month following the month in which the assessment was paid, unless the United Soybean Board determines a different date for remittance of assessments;

To pay refunds of assessments as required by the United States Secretary of Agriculture or as authorized by this subchapter and determined by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board;

To establish escrow accounts to be held and administered as special fund accounts by the Treasurer of State, for the payment of refunds in such amounts and for such periods as required by the United States Secretary of Agriculture or as authorized by this subchapter and determined by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board; provided, that interest from such accounts shall accrue to the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board to be used for authorized activities;

To furnish the United Soybean Board with an annual report by a certified public accountant or an authorized state agency of all funds remitted to the United Soybean Board;

To receive and certify petitions as provided in § 2-20-406(b)(3) and to conduct a referendum election or elections under this subchapter or the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990;

To exempt by resolution a class of persons who purchase one thousand (1,000) or fewer bushels of soybeans in any calendar year from the assessment imposed by § 2-20-406(b)(1);

To contract with the United Soybean Board or other persons to implement plans or projects under this subchapter and the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990; and

To take such further action as may be necessary or appropriate to comply with and to administer this subchapter and the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990.

The communication to appropriate government officials of information relating to the conduct, implementation, or results of promotion, research, consumer information, and industry information;

Any action designed to market soybeans or soybean products directly to a foreign government or a political subdivision thereof; or

The development and recommendation of amendments to this subchapter or the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990.

Publisher's Notes. Former §2-20-405, concerning the holding and conduct of a referendum in each county by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 102, § 3. The former section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 259, § 3; 1979, No. 355, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2003.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3).

U.S. Code. The Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

(1)Except as otherwise prescribed by regulations approved by the United States Secretary of Agriculture or the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board, each person purchasing from, and making payment to, a producer for soybeans produced by such producer and marketed for commercial use, including, in any case in which soybeans are pledged as collateral for a loan issued under any federal price support loan program, the Commodity Credit Corporation, shall be a first purchaser and shall collect an assessment from the producer, and each producer shall pay such assessment to the first purchaser, at the applicable rate prescribed in this section. Each first purchaser shall remit such assessment to the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board or to its designee, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration. For the purpose of this section, purchases from a producer of soybeans or contracts with a producer for production of soybeans for livestock feed or any other application shall constitute marketing for commercial use.

(1)Effective July 1, 1989, there is imposed and levied an assessment at the rate of two cents (2¢) per bushel on all soybeans grown within the State of Arkansas. The assessment shall be deducted from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state, or at the point the soybeans enter into the United States Department of Agriculture loan program.

If the petitions are filed and at the referendum election a majority of the Arkansas soybean producers voting on the question vote against the levy of two cents (2¢) per bushel on soybeans, the assessment shall not thereafter be levied.

Only those soybean producers who produce soybeans in Arkansas in the crop year immediately preceding the referendum election shall be eligible to vote in the election.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the second sentence of (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (c)(1).

U.S. Code. The Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “United States Department of Agriculture, the board or its designee, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “secretary, the board or its designee, the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the first sentence of (b)(1); and, in the third sentence of (c), substituted “United States Department of Agriculture” for “secretary” three times and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “director”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in the second sentence of (b).

U.S. Code. The Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

(1)The proceeds of the assessment shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State into a special fund to be established for the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board; provided, that the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may deduct not more than three percent (3%) to cover the cost of collections.

Each person responsible for the collection and remittance of assessments under § 2-20-406(a) shall report to the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board such information as may be required from time to time by rules approved by the United States Secretary of Agriculture or the board. Such information may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)Each person who is subject to this subchapter shall maintain and make available for inspection by the United States Department of Agriculture, the board or its designee, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, such books and records as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter and the rules issued thereunder, including such records as are necessary to verify any reports required. Such records shall be retained for at least two (2) years beyond the fiscal period of their applicability.

All information obtained from books, records, or reports required to be filed or kept under this section shall be kept confidential by all persons, including employees and former employees of the board, all officers and employees and all former officers and employees of the Department of Finance and Administration, and by all officers and employees and all former officers and employees of contracting parties having access to such information, and shall not be available to board members or any other producers. Only those persons having a specific need for such information in order to effectively administer the provisions of this subchapter shall have access to such information. In addition, only such information so furnished or acquired as the United States Department of Agriculture or the board deems relevant shall be disclosed by them, and then only in a suit or administrative hearing brought at the direction, or upon the request, of the United States Department of Agriculture or the board, or to which the United States Department of Agriculture, any officer of the United States, the board, or the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, is a party. This section shall not be deemed to prohibit:

So long as the assessment on soybeans is as provided in § 2-20-406(b)(1), any soybean producer may request and receive a refund of such assessment, provided he or she makes a written application therefor with the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board or its designee, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, within forty-five (45) days from the date of sale, supported by copies of sales slips signed by the purchaser, and provided further, that the application is filed before the annual accounting is made of the funds not later than July 1 each year.

So long as the assessment on soybeans is as provided in § 2-20-406(b)(2), any soybean producer may request and receive a refund of such assessment to the extent provided by the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990. Such producer shall make written application therefor with the board or its designee, the secretary, within forty-five (45) days from the date the assessment was due from such producer, supported by copies of sales slips signed by the purchaser.

The Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board shall administer this subchapter to promote the soybean industry in Arkansas and shall be vested with the authority and discretion to determine administrative or program implementation and administrative or program expenditure allocations.

(1)(A)The board is authorized to use the funds derived from the assessments imposed in this subchapter for research, extension, market development, and advertising designed to promote the soybean industry in Arkansas, including administration expenses.

Use of these funds may be applied, as prescribed in this section, within or without Arkansas, including regional, national, and international applications.

The funds may also be used to defray costs of referenda.

A.C.R.C. Notes. On July 15, 1999, the Arkansas Supreme Court affirmed the chancery court decree which invalidated the buyer's asessment levied under §2-20-511. Tim Leathers, Comm'r of Revenues, et al v. Gulf Rice Arkansas, Inc. and Gulf Pacific Rice Co., Inc., No. 98-737 (Ark. Sup. Ct. July 15, 1999). Accordingly, pursuant to Acts 1999, No. 16, § 10, the effective date of 1999, No. 16, is July 15, 1999.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 725, § 10: Aug. 1, 1985.

Acts 1999, No. 16, § 10: July 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Act of 1985 is currently subject to litigation; if the assessment levied under that act is ruled invalid substantial damage to the efforts of marketing Arkansas produced rice will result; that this act provides an assessment which is less subject to attack and will assure the continued funding for the program to promote the sale of Arkansas produced rice; and this act should therefore go into effect at the time the existing assessment is ruled invalid if that occurs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. However if the occurrences just described occur prior to a court of competent jurisdiction invalidating the current assessment for Rice Research and Promotion, this act shall become effective at the time of that court decision unless the decision occurs later than ninety-one (91) days after adjournment of this regular session in which case this case will become effective ninety-one (91) days after adjournment of the session.”

Acts 2005, No. 852, § 3: Mar. 15, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act clarifies the use of funds from assessments on grown rice; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to avoid future controversies and to ensure the proper use of the funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2004; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 3; 2005, No. 1994, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 3272.

2-20-404. Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board.

The Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board is created. The board shall be composed of nine (9) producer members appointed by the Governor as follows:

(A)The Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Riceland Foods, Inc., Arkansas Soybean Association, and Agriculture Council of Arkansas shall submit the names of five (5) practical soybean producers to the Governor.

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by those officers or specifically designated by the board. The principal office of the board shall be located at the office of the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, in Little Rock.

The board may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of the affairs of the board.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 2; 1979, No. 355, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2002; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 4; 1999, No. 351, § 1.

2-20-405. Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board — Powers.

The Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board shall have power:

The Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board shall not use funds collected or received under this subchapter or the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990:

To fund plans or projects which make use of any unfair or deceptive acts or practices with respect to the quality, value, or use of any product that competes with soybeans or soybean products; or

To influence any action or policy of the United States Government, any foreign or state government, or any political subdivision thereof; provided, however, that this subdivision (b)(2) shall not apply to:

History.

Acts 1991, No. 340, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 3273.

2-20-406. Assessments on Arkansas-grown soybeans.

Any producer marketing processed soybeans or soybean products of that producer's own production to consumers, either directly or through retail or wholesale outlets, or for export purposes, shall remit the assessment as required by this section.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1) of this section, if an assessment is made under the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990 upon soybeans grown within the State of Arkansas, then, for so long as such assessment is effective, the assessment imposed and levied under this section shall be twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) of the net market price of all soybeans grown within the State of Arkansas. The assessment of twenty-five hundredths of one percent (0.25%) shall not be in addition to the national assessment, but is intended to correspond to the state credit for assessments paid to a qualified state soybean board under the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990. If an assessment under the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990 shall cease to be effective, then, for so long as no such assessment is made, the assessment imposed and levied under this section shall be as provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

(A)So long as the assessment on soybeans provided for in this section is two cents (2¢) per bushel, the question of the levy of the two-cents-per-bushel assessment on soybeans may be referred to a vote of the soybean producers of the state by the filing of petitions with the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board containing signatures of Arkansas soybean producers equal in number to fifteen percent (15%) of all soybean producers in the state.

Disbursement shall be made only upon motion duly passed by the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board and presented to the Treasurer of State and only for the purposes prescribed in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 3; 1979, No. 355, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2003; Acts 1989, No. 102, § 1; 1991, No. 340, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3274, 3275.

2-20-407. Reports — Books and records.

The number of bushels of soybeans purchased, initially transferred, or which, in any other manner, is subject to the collection of the assessment;

The amount of assessments remitted;

The basis, if necessary, to show why the remittance is less than the applicable rate of the assessment per bushel of soybeans purchased multiplied by the number of bushels purchased; and

The date any assessment was paid.

Any producer who plants less than twenty-five (25) acres of soybeans annually shall not be required to maintain books or records under this section.

The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of the number of persons subject to this subchapter or statistical data collected therefrom, which statements do not identify the information furnished by any person; and

The publication, by direction of the United States Secretary of Agriculture or the board, of the name of any person who has been adjudged to have violated this subchapter, together with a statement of the particular provisions of the subchapter violated by such person.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 3; 1979, No. 355, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2003; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3276, 3277.

2-20-408. Refunds to producers.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 3; 1979, No. 355, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2003; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 3278.

2-20-409. Promotion program — Use of funds.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2006; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 9.

Subchapter 5

— Rice Promotion

2-20-501. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Act of 1999”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2501; Acts 1999, No. 16, § 1.

2-20-502. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the growth and development of the rice industry in Arkansas by research, extension, promotion, and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2502.

2-20-503. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or fewer bushels of rice in any calendar year.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2506.

2-20-504. Penalties.

Any buyer who fails to file a report or pay any assessment within the required time set by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall forfeit to the secretary a penalty of five percent (5%) of the assessment determined to be due plus one percent (1%) for each month of delay, or fraction of a month, after the first month after the report was required to be filed or the assessment became due.

The penalty shall be paid to the secretary and shall be disposed of by him or her in the same manner as funds derived from the payment of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The secretary shall collect the penalty levied in this subchapter, together with the delinquent assessment, by any or all of the following methods:

Voluntary payment by the person liable;

Legal proceedings instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Injunctive relief to enjoin any buyer owing an assessment or penalty from operating his or her business or engaging in business as a buyer of rice until the delinquent assessment or penalty is paid.

Any person required to pay the assessment provided for in this subchapter who refuses to allow full inspection of the premises or any book, record, or other document relating to the liability of the person for the assessment imposed in this subchapter or who shall hinder or in any way delay or prevent the inspection shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added “or” in (b)(2); and substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1); and substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a) and (b).

Three (3) members shall represent the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation;

Two (2) members shall represent Riceland Foods, Inc.;

One (1) member shall represent the Agricultural Council of Arkansas;

One (1) member shall represent Producers Rice Mill, Inc.;

One (1) member shall represent the Arkansas Rice Council; and

One (1) member shall represent the independent mills of Arkansas.

All of the nine (9) producer members of the board shall be practical producers of rice in the State of Arkansas and shall be nominated by their respective organizations.

Each year, not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration of the terms of the current board members whose terms expire in that year, the organizations named in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall submit to the Governor names of two (2) nominees for each position to be filled on the board from the respective organizations, and the Governor shall appoint the new members from each list of nominees.

Each member selected shall serve for a term of two (2) years and until his or her successor is duly selected as provided in this section.

The board may establish rules for its own government and for the administration of affairs of the board.

The resident agent of the board shall be the executive vice president, Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, or his or her designee.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 725, § 3, provided, in part, that within ten days after August 1, 1985, each of the organizations named in this section should submit the names of two practical rice producers to the Governor for each position to be appointed from nominations of the respective organization. The Governor was to appoint three members from the list submitted by the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., two members from the list submitted by Riceland Foods, Inc., one member representing Agricultural Council of Arkansas, one member representing Producers Rice Mill, Inc., one member representing Arkansas Rice Council, and one member representing the Independent Millers of Arkansas to serve on the board. The members selected from the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., were to draw lots to determine their terms so that two of them would serve for terms of two years and one would serve for a term of one year. The members selected from Riceland Foods, Inc., were to draw lots so that one would serve for a term of one year and one serve for a term of two years. The members from the other organizations were to draw lots for terms so that two would serve for terms of one year and two would serve for terms of two years.

Cross References. Division of Agriculture — Service on boards or commissions, §6-64-106.

Publisher's Notes. Former §2-20-506, concerning the referendum in each county, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 16, § 3. The section was derived from the following sources: Acts 1985, No. 725, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2504.

An assessment at the rate of one and thirty-five hundredths cents (1.35¢) per bushel to be paid by the buyer at the first point of sale, whether within or without the state, on rice grown within the state or at the point the rice enters into the United States Department of Agriculture loan program; and

An assessment at the rate of one and thirty-five hundredths cents (1.35¢) per bushel to be paid by the producer on all rice grown within this state.

Market development and promotion;

Basic administration expenses; and

Defraying the costs of referenda that the board may refer to buyers of rice.

The funds derived from the assessment paid by a producer shall be used for:

Rice extension and rice research;

Basic administration expenses; and

Defraying the costs of referenda that the board may refer to producers of rice.

Funds under subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section may be applied within or without Arkansas, including regional, national, and international applications.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

McCorkle, Constitutional Law — Arkansas' Nondelegation Doctrine: The Arkansas Supreme Court Defines a Limit on the Delegation of Legislative Authority to a Private Party, 23 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 297.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b)(1) and (2).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning refunds to producers, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 16, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 725, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2504.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2505; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 15; 2019, No. 910, § 3279.

2-20-505. Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board.

The Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board is created.

(1)The board shall be composed of nine (9) producer members to be appointed by the Governor as follows:

The members of the board shall meet and organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by those officers or specifically designated by the board. All officers shall serve for a period of one (1) year and until their successors are duly elected.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2503; Acts 1999, No. 16, § 2.

2-20-506. [Repealed.]

There are imposed and levied:

The assessment imposed and levied by this section shall be collected by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration from the buyer of rice at the first point of sale or at the point the rice enters into the United States Department of Agriculture loan program.

(1)The proceeds of the assessment, less not more than three percent (3%) to cover the cost of collections, shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State in a special fund to be established for the Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board to the credit of the board.

Disbursement shall be made only upon a motion duly passed by the board and presented to the Treasurer of State and only for a purpose prescribed in this subchapter.

(1)The funds derived from the assessment paid by a buyer at the first point of sale shall be used for:

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2504; Acts 1999, No. 16, § 4; 2005, No. 852, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3280.

2-20-508. Records and other documentation.

(1)Every buyer shall keep a complete and accurate record of all rice handled by him or her.

The records shall be in such form and contain other information as the Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board shall prescribe by rule.

The record shall be preserved for a period of one (1) year and shall be offered for inspection at any time upon written demand by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or any duly authorized agent or representative of him or her.

(1)At such times as the secretary may require, every buyer shall submit reports or otherwise document any information deemed necessary for the efficient collection of the assessment imposed in this subchapter.

The secretary shall have the power to cause any duly authorized agent or representative to enter upon the premises of any buyer of rice and examine or cause to be examined by the agent any books, papers, and records which deal in any way with respect to the payment of the assessment or enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2504; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 19; 2019, No. 910, §§
3281, 3282.

2-20-509. [Repealed.]

The Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board shall plan and conduct a program of research, extension, market development, and advertising designed to promote the rice industry in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 725, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2507; Acts 1999, No. 16, § 6; 2005, No. 852, § 2.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted the subdivision (a) designation; and deleted former (b).

2-20-511. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning a referendum for alternative assessment on grown rice, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1553, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 344, § 1.

Subchapter 6

— Wheat Promotion

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 283, § 9: Aug. 1, 1985.

Acts 1995, No. 107, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increase in the Wheat Promotion Board Assessment should apply to the current year's crop; and that unless this act goes into effect on July 1, 1995, a substantial portion of the crop will not be subject to the increased assessment levied by this act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-20-601. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the growth and development of the wheat industry in Arkansas by research, extension, promotion, and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2401.

2-20-602. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to any person who purchases one thousand (1,000) or fewer bushels of wheat in any calendar year.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 283, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2405.